src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! ## Inflected pronominal forms



!! ## Case inflection 

LEXICON me_pron !"minä"
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** *minä*
+Sg+Nom:me # ;
+Sg+Obl:maan # ;
+Sg+Dat:mange # ;
+Sg+Abl:manna # ;
+Sg+Ins:mansa # ;
+Sg+Gen:mango # ;
+Pl+Nom:men # ;
+Pl+Nom:ame # ;
+Pl+Nom:amen # ;
+Pl+Obl:meen # ;
+Pl+Obl:ameen # ;
+Pl+Dat:maege # ;
+Pl+Abl:menna # ;
+Pl+Ins:mensa # ;
+Pl+Gen:mengo # ;
+Pl+Dat:amaege # ;
+Pl+Abl:amenna # ;
+Pl+Ins:amensa # ;
+Pl+Gen:amengo # ;

LEXICON tu_pron 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** "sinä" 
+Sg+Nom:tu # ;
+Sg+Obl:tuut # ; 
+Sg+Dat:tukke # ;
+Sg+Abl:tutta # ;
+Sg+Ins:tussa # ;
+Sg+Ins:tuha # ;
+Sg+Gen:tukko # ;
+Pl+Nom:tumen # ;
+Pl+Nom:tume # ;
+Pl+Obl:tumeen # ;
+Pl+Obl:tumen # ;
+Pl+Dat:tumege # ;
+Pl+Abl:tumenna # ;
+Pl+Ins:tumensa # ;
+Pl+Gen:tumengo # ;

LEXICON jou_pron 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** "hän"  
+Sg+Nom+Msc:jou # ;
+Sg+Obl+Msc:les # ;
+Sg+Dat+Msc:leske # ;
+Sg+Abl+Msc:lesta # ;
+Sg+Ins+Msc:lessa # ;
+Sg+Gen+Msc:lesko # ;

+Sg+Nom+Fem:joi # ;
+Sg+Obl+Fem:la # ;
+Sg+Dat+Fem:lake # ;
+Sg+Abl+Fem:latta # ;
+Sg+Ins+Fem:laha # ;
+Sg+Gen+Fem:lako # ;

+Pl+Nom:joon # ;
+Pl+Obl:leen # ;
+Pl+Dat:lenge # ;
+Pl+Abl:lenna # ;
+Pl+Ins:lensa # ;
+Pl+Gen:lengo # ;


LEXICON es_case
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Pl+Nom: K ;
es_case_obl ;

LEXICON SAARO
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:o K ;
+Pl+Nom:e K ;
es_case_obl ;

LEXICON es_case_obl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** c
+Sg+Obl:es K ;
+Sg+Dat:eske K ;
+Sg+Abl:esta K ;
+Sg+Ins:eha K ;
+Sg+Gen:esko K ;
+Pl+Obl:en K ;
+Pl+Dat:enge K ;
+Pl+Abl:enna K ;
+Pl+Ins:ensa K ;
+Pl+Gen:engo K ;

LEXICON SAKKO
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Msc+Sg:%>o # ;
+Fem+Sg:%>o # ; ! sakki ???
+Pl:%>a # ;
+Sg+Obl:ones K ;
+Sg+Dat:oneske K ;
+Sg+Abl:onesta K ;
+Sg+Ins:oneha K ;
+Sg+Gen:onesko K ;
+Pl+Obl:onen K ;
+Pl+Dat:onenge K ;
+Pl+Abl:onenna K ;
+Pl+Ins:onensa K ;
+Pl+Gen:onengo K ;
+Pl:%>e # ;
+Pl+Obl:anen K ;
+Pl+Dat:anenge K ;
+Pl+Abl:anenna K ;
+Pl+Ins:anensa K ;
+Pl+Gen:anengo K ;

LEXICON indef_temaattinen
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** thematic adjectival declension. Oblique?
+Sg+Msc:%>o K ;
+Sg+Fem:%>i K ;
+Pl:%>e K ;
